Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2709.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 22-6-15 and 22-6-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 22-6 entitled
"Committees and Staff" are hereby amended to read as follows:
22-6-15. Annual appropriations.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum that shall be necessary to carry out
the provisions of §§ 22-6-10 — 22-6-14 and § 22-6-16.
22-6-16. Nonprofit funding transparency.
(a) Any nonprofit entity that receives grants or other funding in excess of fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) from the general assembly directly or appropriated through the state budget for
any fiscal year shall, within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the grant or appropriation, provide
information relating to employee compensation within the nonprofit entity provide a complete and
detailed list consisting of the highest paid director, officer and employee, including the name and
salary, costs and benefits, including but not limited to, health insurance, retirement or pension
benefits, rental cars, lodging, communication devices, and any other form of compensation to the
general assembly. Any other sources of funding, including fundraising, endowments, trusts,
memorial gifts or any and all activities that fund the nonprofit entity shall also be included in the
disclosure.
(b) The nonprofit entity shall disclose the total benefit package paid to the five (5) highest
compensated employees with reportable compensation of at least one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) from the organization during the previous fiscal year. This disclosure shall include a

description of the position; the total salary or compensation paid along with all benefits provided,
including but not limited to: health insurance, retirement, or pension contributions; and any other
allowances for items such as automobiles, lodging, or communication devices. Provided, however,
the name of the individual employee need not be disclosed.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004509
========
LC004509 - Page 2 of 3